Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Business Practices.

Sec. 45.27.250.
Required posting.

An authorized dealer shall post a notice of the authorized dealer’s retail labor rate in a place conspicuous to service customers. If the authorized dealer uses a factory-certified or factory-trained technician to perform warranty service work, the notice must also contain a statement that warranty service work completed by the authorized dealer is performed by a factory-certified or factory-trained technician.

If an authorized dealer’s service operations employees receive a commission for the amount of work they perform, the authorized dealer shall post a conspicuous sign that is visible to service customers that the authorized dealer’s service operations employees work on commission.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.260.
Written estimates for repairs not covered by warranty.

Before beginning repair work on a product for a customer, an authorized dealer shall provide to the customer a written estimate listing the specific parts, labor, and cost of the repairs.

If additional repairs are determined to be necessary after the service employees begin repairing the product, the authorized dealer shall contact the customer and receive permission to do additional repairs not covered in the written estimate.

An authorized dealer shall post in a conspicuous place for service customers to view all charges for diagnostics, storage, and other incidentals not associated with the actual repair of a product.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.270.
Content of factory recall notices.

A manufacturer shall include in a written factory recall notice to ultimate purchasers and authorized dealers the date by which the manufacturer expects that necessary parts and equipment will be available to the authorized dealer for the correction of the defect that is the subject of the recall.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.280.
Resale without disclosure prohibited.

A manufacturer may not resell in the state a product returned under AS

45.27.190

unless the manufacturer fully discloses to the prospective buyer before the resale is concluded the reason why the product was returned.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)